Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska24-201.01
Supreme Court judges; salary; amount; restriction on other employment of judges.

On July 1, 2024, the salary of the Chief Justice and the judges of the Supreme Court shall be two hundred twenty-five thousand fifty-five dollars and thirty-five cents. On July 1, 2025, the salary of the Chief Justice and the judges of the Supreme Court shall be two hundred twenty-eight thousand four hundred thirty-one dollars and eighteen cents. On July 1, 2026, the salary of the Chief Justice and the judges of the Supreme Court shall be two hundred thirty-one thousand eight hundred fifty-seven dollars and sixty-five cents.

The Chief Justice and the judges of the Supreme Court shall hold no other public office of profit or trust during their terms of office nor accept any public appointment or employment under the authority of the government of the United States for which they receive compensation for their services. Such salaries shall be payable in equal monthly installments.

Laws 1947, c. 345, § 1, p. 1089;

Laws 1951, c. 58, § 1, p. 191;

Laws 1955, c. 77, § 1, p. 231;

Laws 1959, c. 93, § 1, p. 406;

Laws 1963, c. 127, § 1, p. 480;

Laws 1963, c. 534, § 1, p. 1676;

Laws 1967, c. 136, § 1, p. 421;

Laws 1969, c. 173, § 1, p. 754;

Laws 1969, c. 174, § 1, p. 755;

Laws 1972, LB 1293, § 2;

Laws 1974, LB 923, § 1;

Laws 1976, LB 76, § 1;

Laws 1978, LB 672, § 1;

Laws 1979, LB 398, § 1;

Laws 1983, LB 269, § 1;

Laws 1986, LB 43, § 1;

Laws 1987, LB 564, § 1;

Laws 1990, LB 42, § 1;

Laws 1995, LB 189, § 1;

Laws 1997, LB 362, § 1;

Laws 1999, LB 350, § 1;

Laws 2001, LB 357, § 1;

Laws 2005, LB 348, § 1;

Laws 2007, LB377, § 1;

Laws 2009, LB414, § 1;

Laws 2012, LB862, § 1;

Laws 2013, LB306, § 1;

Laws 2015, LB663, § 1;

Laws 2017, LB647, § 1;

Laws 2019, LB300, § 1;

Laws 2021, LB386, § 1;

Laws 2023, LB799, § 1;

Laws 2025, LB513, § 1.

Legislature had constitutional right to fix salary in first instance to commence on effective date of act, notwithstanding it increased compensation during term. State ex rel. Johnson v. Marsh, 149 Neb. 1, 29 N.W.2d 799 (1947).